Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 17
DRIVER TRAINING COURSES

Section.

33-1701. Driver training courses.

In conjunction with its supervision of traffic on public highways, the Idaho transportation department is directed to cooperate with the state board of education in its establishment of driver training courses in the public schools of the state.

33-1702. Minimum standards for courses.

The state board of education and the transportation department shall cooperate in establishing, and amending as need arises, minimum standards for driver training programs reimbursable hereunder.

Such standards shall require not less than thirty (30) clock hours of classroom instruction, six (6) hours observation time in a driver training car, and six (6) hours behind-the-wheel practice driving; but the state board of education may allow in lieu of not more than three (3) hours of such practice driving, such equivalent thereof in simulated practice driving as the said board may have, by uniform rules, approved. The board shall adopt standards necessary to allow completion of the thirty (30) clock hours of required classroom instruction through an approved correspondence course.

33-1703. Eligible pupils — Time courses offered.

Reimbursable programs shall be open to all residents of the state, of the ages fourteen and one-half (14 ½) through twenty-one (21) years whether or not they are enrolled in a public, private or parochial school. Residents living within any school district operating, or participating in the operation of, an authorized driver training program, shall enroll, when possible, in the training program offered in the school district of residence.

No charge or enrollment fee, not required to be paid by public school pupils for driver training, shall be required to be paid by residents not then attending public schools.

Driver training programs herein authorized may, at the discretion of the board of trustees, be conducted after school hours, or on Saturdays, or during regular school vacations.

33-1704. Authorization to operate program.

The board of trustees of any school district proposing to establish an authorized driver training program shall, as a condition of reimbursement for costs incurred in the driver training program, not less than thirty (30) days prior to the proposed commencement thereof, submit to the state department of education the plan therefor. The state department shall approve or disapprove such plan within ten (10) days after receipt from the district of the proposal, and shall give written notice of its decision to said board of trustees. Any school district which operates any driver training program without prior written approval from the state department of education shall not be entitled to reimbursement, as provided in section 33-1707, Idaho Code, for the unapproved plan, or the unapproved portions of any plan.

33-1705. Two or more districts cooperating.

Two (2) or more school districts may, by written agreement, offer a driver training program jointly. In such case the plan shall be submitted by one (1) of the districts which shall be designated as the operating district; and upon approval of the plan, all reports and apportionments of funds shall be made as though the designated operating district were the only district operating the program. The absence of a written agreement, however, shall not limit the board of trustees of any school district in accepting enrollments in its driver training program on the part of residents in neighboring school districts.

33-1706. Reports to state department of education.

Each school district that has completed a course or courses in driver training, whether approved for reimbursement or not, shall submit a report to the state department of education not later than forty-five (45) days after completion of the last course or courses in each fiscal year, showing (1) the number of pupils who enrolled; (2) the number of pupils who completed the course; and (3) the total cost of operation of the program, together with such other information as the state board may require. Failure to submit reports to the state department of education shall be cause for the state department of education to disallow reimbursement even for a prior approved driver training program.

33-1707. Reimbursement — Determination — Certification.

From the data provided by the school district, as required by section 33-1706, Idaho Code, the state department of education shall compute the average of the number of pupils enrolling in the course and those completing the same and determine for such average number the per-pupil cost thereof.
(1)(a) From the data provided by the school district, as required by section 33-1706, Idaho Code, the state department of education shall compute the average of the number of pupils enrolling in the course and those completing the same and determine for such average number the per-pupil cost thereof.

The amount due the district from the driver training account in the state treasury shall be the total cost of operating the program, or the average of the number enrolling in the course and those completing the same, multiplied by one hundred fifty dollars ($150), whichever is the lesser.

On or before the fifteenth day of February, and the thirtieth day of June, and the fifteenth day of September in each year, the state superintendent of public instruction shall certify to the state controller a list of school districts having submitted the reports required in section 33-1706, Idaho Code, and the amount of money due to each as computed under the provisions of subsection (1) of this section. The state controller shall draw his warrants against the driver training account in the state treasury, in favor of the several districts entitled thereto, in the amount so certified. Annually, no later than the first day of September in each year, the state superintendent of public instruction shall cause the supervisor of driver training to prepare a report listing the names of the school districts having submitted the reports as required in section 33-1706, Idaho Code, and the amounts of money paid each as computed under the provisions of subsection (1) of this section.

33-1708. Administration — State supervisor of driver training — Employees — Expenses.

The state superintendent of public instruction shall administer the driver training fund [account]. The state board of education shall employ within its department of education a state supervisor of driver training, who shall be a full-time employee, and such other supervisory and clerical help as may be deemed necessary, to effectuate the provisions hereof. The state superintendent of public instruction shall cause to be maintained an accurate, current, and complete record of all costs of administering and supervising the driver training program in the state. Annually, not later than the first day of September, the state superintendent of public instruction shall cause the supervisor of driver training to prepare a report showing the actual expenses incurred in administering and supervising the driver training program during the preceding fiscal year ending June 30.